Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2435
Formal testacy proceedings; partial intestacy.

If it becomes evident in the course of a formal testacy proceeding that, though one or more instruments are entitled to be probated, the decedent's estate is or may be partially intestate, the court shall enter an order to that effect.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 113, UPC § 3-411.